Utah statutes.
76-8-418.   Damaging jails.

A person who willfully and intentionally breaks down, pulls down, destroys, floods, or otherwise damages any public jail or other place of confinement, including a detention, shelter, or secure confinement facility for juveniles, is guilty of a felony of the third degree.

